Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3413
Incapacity of principal; notice.

Notice of a determination that a principal is incapable of making health care decisions shall be given by the attending physician (1) to the principal when there is any indication of the principal's ability to comprehend such notice, (2) to the attorney in fact, and (3) to the health care provider.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 25.